Washington statutes.
RCW 1.40.020

Nominating committee created—Composition—Meeting—Rules.

There is created the state medal of merit committee for nominating candidates for the award of the state medal of merit. The committee membership consists of the governor, president of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives, and the chief justice of the supreme court, or their designees. The secretary of state shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member, and shall serve as secretary to the committee. The committee shall meet annually to consider candidates for nomination. The committee shall adopt rules establishing the qualifications for the state medal of merit, the protocol governing the decoration, and the appurtenances necessary to the implementation of this chapter.

[ 1986 c 92 s 2.]